Maryland, session 2025, HB1452.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
10–301.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1452*

HOUSE BILL 1452
(b) “Gender identity” has the meaning stated in § 20–101 of the State Government
Article.
(c) “Homeless” means:
(1) lacking a fixed, regular, and adequate nighttime residence; or
(2) having a primary nighttime residence that is:
(i) a supervised publicly or privately operated shelter designed to
provide temporary living accommodations; or
(ii) a public or private place not designed for or ordinarily used as a
regular sleeping accommodation for human beings.
(d) (1) “Sexual orientation” means [the identification of an individual as to
male or female homosexuality, heterosexuality, or bisexuality] AN INDIVIDUAL’S
IDENTITY, OR ANOTHER’S PERCEPTION OF AN INDIVIDUAL’S IDENTITY, IN RELATION
TO THE GENDER OR GENDERS TO WHICH THE INDIVIDUAL IS SEXUALLY OR
EMOTIONALLY ATTRACTED.
(2) “SEXUAL ORIENTATION” DOES NOT MEAN GENDER IDENTITY.
Article – Public Safety
2–307.
(a) (1) IN THIS SECTION, “HATE BIAS INCIDENT” MEANS AN ACT OF
HOSTILITY OR AGGRESSION THAT:
(I) IS DIRECTED AT AN INDIVIDUAL OR A GROUP, PRIVATE
PROPERTY, OR PUBLIC PROPERTY;
(II) IS MOTIVATED, IN WHOLE OR SUBSTANTIALLY IN PART, BY
ANOTHER INDIVIDUAL’S OR GROUP’S ACTUAL OR PERCEIVED PROTECTED CLASS
STATUS AS SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTION (C)(1) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(III) DOES NOT CONSTITUTE A CRIME UNDER STATE OR FEDERAL
LAW.
(2) “HATE BIAS INCIDENT” INCLUDES:
(I) SLURS, NAME–CALLING, AND INSULTS;

HOUSE BILL 1452 3
(II) THE DISPLAY OF MATERIAL WITH OFFENSIVE LANGUAGE,
SYMBOLS, OR THREATS TARGETING A PROTECTED CLASS ON PRIVATE PROPERTY;
(III) THE POSTING OF MATERIAL WITH OFFENSIVE LANGUAGE,
SYMBOLS, OR THREATS TARGETING A PROTECTED CLASS THAT DOES NOT RESULT
IN PROPERTY DAMAGE;
(IV) ELECTRONIC AND ONLINE DISTRIBUTION OF MATERIAL
WITH OFFENSIVE LANGUAGE, SYMBOLS, OR THREATS TARGETING A PROTECTED
CLASS; AND
(V) DISTRIBUTION OF MATERIALS WITH MESSAGES USING
OFFENSIVE LANGUAGE, SYMBOLS, OR THREATS TARGETING A PROTECTED CLASS IN
A PUBLIC PLACE.
(B) (1) The Department shall collect, analyze, and disseminate:
(i) information about the incidence of crime in the State; and
(ii) information, including race and sex, on the total number of law
enforcement employees, de–identified and disaggregated by:
1. position for civilian employees; and
2. rank for sworn employees.
(2) Each law enforcement agency shall provide the Department with the
information described in paragraph (1) of this subsection in the format that the Secretary
requires.
[(b)] (C) (1) The Department shall collect and analyze information about
HATE CRIMES AND HATE BIAS incidents apparently directed against an individual or
group because of race, color, religious beliefs, sexual orientation, gender, disability, national
origin, or homelessness.
(2) Each local law enforcement agency and the State Fire Marshal shall
provide the Department with the information described in paragraph (1) of this subsection.
(3) The Department shall adopt procedures for the collection and analysis
of the information described in paragraph (1) of this subsection.
(4) The Department shall make quarterly reports to the Commission on
Civil Rights about the information described in paragraph (1) of this subsection.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.